Utah statutes.
9-9-206.   State jurisdiction subject to provisions of federal law and
resolution of tribe.
The jurisdiction assumed pursuant to this chapter is subject to the
limitations and provisions of the federal Act of Congress of April 11, 1968,
82 Stat. 78-80 (Public Law 284, 90th Congress), and the specific limitations
set forth in each resolution ceding jurisdiction to the state, both as to
geographical area and subject matter.
